Hawaii statutes.
[§461J-10.11] Content standards of
continuing competence. (a) Continuing competence units shall be obtained
in subjects related to either the professional practice of physical therapy or
patient/client management.

(b) The "professional practice of physical
therapy" includes but is not limited to professional accountability,
professional behavior, and professional development.

(c) "Patient/client management"
includes but is not limited to examination, evaluation, diagnosis, and
prognosis; plan of care; implementation; education; and discharge. [L 2013, c
35, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol10_Ch0436-0474
Next